Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2169.1] Energy systems
development special fund. (a) There is established the energy systems
development special fund for the purpose of developing an integrated approach
to and portfolio management of renewable energy and energy efficiency technology
projects that will reduce Hawaii's dependence on fossil fuel, imported oil, and
other imported energy resources and move Hawaii toward energy self-sufficiency.

(b) Deposits into the special fund may be from
the following:

(1) Appropriations from the legislature;

(2) A portion of the environmental response, energy,
and food security tax pursuant to section 243-3.5; and

(3) Investment earnings, gifts, donations, or other
income received by the Hawaii natural energy institute.

(c) The Hawaii natural energy institute shall
administer the special fund and may expend revenues of the special fund for the
following activities:

(1) Obtaining matching funds from federal and private
sources for research, development, and demonstration of renewable energy
sources;

(2) Awarding contracts or grants to develop and
deploy technologies that will reduce Hawaii's dependence on imported energy
resources and imported oil. Projects may be commissioned that:

(A) Balance the risk, benefits, and time
horizons of the investment to ensure tangible benefits to the Hawaii consumer,
with priority given to short-term technology development;

(B) Emphasize innovative and renewable energy
supply and energy efficient end use technologies focusing on environmental
attributes, reliability, and affordability;

(C) Enhance transmission and distribution
capabilities of renewable energy supply for electricity;

(D) Enhance reliability and storage
capabilities of renewable energy for electricity;

(E) Ensure that research, deployment, and
demonstration efforts build on existing programs and resources and are not
duplicated;

(F) Address critical technical and scientific
barriers to achieving energy self-sufficiency by reducing dependence on
imported oil and imported energy resources;

(G) Ensure that technology used and developed
for renewable energy production and distribution will be commercially viable;
and

(H) Give priority to resources that are
indigenous and unique to Hawaii; and

(3) Managing the portfolio of projects commissioned
under this subsection. [L 2014, c 107, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next